Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Chapter 25. Witnesses; Subpoena; Contempt.

Cross references. —

For limitation on appearances of executive branch employee before the legislature, see AS

44.17.080

.

Administrative Code. —

For public information, see 2 AAC 96.

Sec. 24.25.010.
Issuance and form of subpoena.

A subpoena requiring the attendance of a witness before either house of the legislature may be issued by the president or the speaker.

A subpoena requiring the attendance of a witness before a standing or special committee of the legislature may be issued by the chairman of a committee when authorized to do so by a majority of the membership of the committee and with the concurrence of the president or the speaker, or with the concurrence of the house or the senate.

A subpoena requiring the attendance of a witness before an interim committee established by either house of the legislature, or by both, may be issued by the chairman of a committee when authorized to do so by a majority of the membership of the committee and with the concurrence of the president or the speaker.

The subpoena is sufficient if

it states before whom the proceeding is held;

it is addressed to the witness;

it requires the attendance of the witness at a time and place certain;

it is signed

by the president or the speaker under (a) of this section, or

by the committee chairman with the concurrence of the president or the speaker under (b) and (c) of this section.

This section does not apply to the legislative council or to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee.

History.

(§ 4-4-1 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 94 SLA 1975)

Cross references. —

For legislative council’s power to issue subpoenas, see AS

24.20.060

(2).
For legislative budget and audit committee’s power to issue subpoenas, see AS

24.20.201(a)(2)

.

Collateral references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories, and Dependencies, § 50.

Sec. 24.25.020.
Service of subpoena.

A person over the age of 19 years who is competent as a witness in the state courts may serve the subpoena.
The person’s affidavit that the person delivered a copy to the witness is evidence of service.

History.

(§ 4-4-2 ACLA 1949; am § 8 ch 245 SLA 1970)

Sec. 24.25.030.
Disobeying subpoena or refusing to testify.

If a witness neglects or refuses to obey a subpoena, or neglects or refuses to testify or to produce upon reasonable notice any material and proper books, papers, or documents in the possession or under the control of the witness, the senate or house of representatives may by resolution entered on its journal commit the witness for contempt.
If contempt is committed before a committee, the committee shall report the contempt to the senate or house of representatives, as the case may be, for such action as may be considered necessary.

History.

(§ 4-4-3 ACLA 1949)

Collateral references. —

17 Am. Jur. 2d, Contempt,
§§ 238-240.

Perjury or false swearing as contempt, 89 ALR2d 1258.

Sec. 24.25.040.
Arrest for disobedience to subpoena.

A witness who neglects or refuses to attend in obedience to subpoena may be arrested by the sergeant-at-arms and brought before the senate or house of representatives, as the case may be.
The only warrant or authority necessary authorizing arrest is a copy of a resolution of the senate or house of representatives signed by the president of the senate or speaker of the house of representatives, as the case may be, and countersigned by the secretary of the senate or the clerk of the house of representatives, as the case may be.

History.

(§ 4-4-4 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 24.25.050.
Witness fees and mileage.

A person appearing before either house, or both, or a legislative committee in response to a subpoena is entitled to $20 for each day’s attendance, and for the time necessary in coming and returning to the person’s place of residence and mileage at the rate of 15 cents a mile for the distance traveled in going to and returning from the place of attendance.
The witness fee and mileage fee shall be paid out of the state treasury upon presentation of a certificate of attendance and mileage due, signed by the presiding officer of the house that authorized issuance of subpoena.

History.

(§ 4-4-5 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 1951)

Sec. 24.25.060.
Oath and penalty for violation of oath.

The president of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives and the chairman of every committee of either body may administer an oath to a witness appearing before the respective bodies. A person who wilfully swears or affirms falsely concerning any matter material to the subject under investigation or inquiry is guilty of perjury and upon conviction is punishable by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than five years.

History.

(§ 4-4-6 ACLA 1949)

Collateral references. —

60A Am. Jur. 2d, Perjury, § 1 et seq.

Perjury or false swearing as contempt, 89 ALR2d 1258.

Sec. 24.25.070.
Grant of immunity on claim of privilege of self-incrimination.

A person called as a witness before the senate, house of representatives, or a committee of either or both, who refuses to answer any question or to produce any book, paper, or document relating to the matter under inquiry, on the ground that the answer or the production may tend to incriminate the person, may be granted immunity from punishment for the offense to which the question or evidence relates by resolution of the house that is conducting the inquiry. The resolution shall be entered upon its journal, and the witness may then be compelled to answer the question or produce the evidence.

If a witness is granted immunity and compelled to testify or produce evidence after claiming the privilege of self-incrimination, the witness may not thereafter be prosecuted in any court for the offense to which the question or evidence relates.

History.

(§ 4-4-7 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 24.25.080.
Punishment for disobedience to subpoena or refusal to testify.

A person subpoenaed as provided in this chapter who fails, neglects, or refuses to attend at the time and place where the person’s presence is required, or fails, neglects, or refuses to produce the books, papers, or instruments or other evidence designated in the subpoena, or who having attended in response to the subpoena, or having appeared voluntarily, refuses to testify as to any material and proper matter within the power of the senate, house of representatives, or a committee to investigate, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500, or by imprisonment for not less than 30 days nor more than six months.

History.

(§ 4-4-8 ACLA 1949)